Utah statutes.
48-2e-404.   General partner's liability.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2) and (3), all general partners are liable jointly and severally for all debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the limited partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

(2)  A person that becomes a general partner of an existing limited partnership is not personally liable for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited partnership incurred before the person became a general partner.

(3)  A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership incurred while the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership is solely the debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability limited partnership.  A general partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability limited partnership solely by reason of being or acting as a general partner.  This Subsection (3) applies despite anything inconsistent in the partnership agreement that existed immediately before the vote or consent required to become a limited liability limited partnership under Subsection 48-2e-406(2)(b).

(4)  The failure of a limited liability limited partnership to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not a ground for imposing liability on a general partner of the limited liability limited partnership for a debt, obligation, or liability of the limited partnership.

(5)  An amendment of a certificate of limited partnership which deletes a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership does not affect the limitation in this section on liability of a general partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited partnership incurred before the amendment became effective.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

